Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 610 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All public employees shall have the right of self-organization
and the right to form, join, or assist any employee organization of
bargaining collectively through representatives of their own
choosing on questions of wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and to engage in lawful, concerted
activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual
aid or protection, free from interference, restraint, or coercion.

Req. No. 15374 Page 1

An e mployee shall have the right to refrain from any or all of such
activities.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15374 TKR 01/08/26



















Req. No. 15374 Page 2